apertium-sah.sah.lexc
LEXICON CASES-OBL

%<par%>:%>%{T%}%{A%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} # "weight: 0.2" ;
%<acc%>:%>%{n%}%{I%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>%{t%}т%{A%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>%{i%}н%{A%}н # ;
%<com%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{I%}н # ;
%<comp%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{A%}р # ;

LEXICON CASES-POSS-3SP

%<par%>:%>н%{A%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}р # ;
%<acc%>:%>н # ;
%<abl%>:%>тт%{A%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>н%{A%}н # ;
%<com%>:%>н%{I%}%{I%}н # ;
%<comp%>:%>н%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{A%}р # ;

LEXICON CASES-POSS-12SG

%<par%>:%>н%{A%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>н # ;
%<abl%>:%>тт%{A%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>н%{A%}н # ;
%<com%>:%>н%{I%}%{I%}н # ;
%<comp%>:%>н%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{A%}р # ;

LEXICON CASES-NOM

%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ; 

!LEXICON POSS-JNW
!
!CASES-ETC ;
!%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}%{М%}%{ы%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}%{Ҥ%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px1pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т%{ы%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px2pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}т%{ы%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{ы%} CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON POSS-OBL

CASES-ETC ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{B%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-12SG ;
%<px1sg%>%<dat%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}р # ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-12SG ;
%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}р # ; 
!%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ; ! Dir/RL ! FIXME: check!
!%<px3sg%>:%>%{t%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}т%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;

LEXICON POSS-PX3PL-OBL-SG

%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;
%<px3sg%>:%>%{t%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;

LEXICON POSS-PX3PL-OBL-PL

%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;

LEXICON POSS-OBL-PL

POSS-OBL ;
POSS-PX3PL-OBL-PL ;

LEXICON POSS-OBL-SG

POSS-OBL ;
POSS-PX3PL-OBL-SG ;

!LEXICON N-IRREG-STEM
!
!%<n%>: POSS-NOM-SG "weight: -0.1" ;
!%<n%>: POSS-OBL-SG "weight: -0.1" ;

LEXICON POSS-NOM

CASES-ETC ;
POSS-NOM-ENDINGS ;

LEXICON POSS-NOM-ENDINGS
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}м CASES-NOM ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ҥ CASES-NOM ;
!%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ; ! Dir/RL ! FIXME: check!
!%<px3sg%>:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т CASES-NOM ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}т CASES-NOM ;

LEXICON POSS-PX3PL-NOM-SG

%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{A%} CASES-NOM ;
%<px3sg%>:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;

LEXICON POSS-PX3PL-NOM-PL

%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;

LEXICON POSS-NOM-PL

POSS-NOM ;
POSS-PX3PL-NOM-PL ;

LEXICON POSS-NOM-SG

POSS-NOM ;
POSS-PX3PL-NOM-SG ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST 

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES-NOM ;
%<subst%>: CASES-OBL ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-NOM ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-OBL ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC

%<loc%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ; ! FIXME: check

LEXICON CASES-ETC

! CASES ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-SG

POSS-NOM-SG ;
POSS-OBL-SG ;
!POSS-JNW ;
CASES ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-PL

POSS-NOM-PL ;
POSS-OBL-PL ;
CASES ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-NOM ;
CASES-OBL ;
! ABESS ;

LEXICON GER-SUBST

! FIXME: check which option is right:
!N-INFL-COMMON ;
SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-SUBST-NOM  ! when only <nom> comes after a gerund

%<nom%>: # ;
POSS-NOM-ENDINGS ;


LEXICON SUBST

! The spaghetti starting here is to keep the state of affairs
! described in plural.yaml
N-INFL-COMMON-SG ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON-PL ;

LEXICON LII-POSTPOSITION

%+лыы%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

SUBST ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: LII-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON N1-IRREG-PL

%<n%>%<pl%>: N-INFL-COMMON-PL ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;
:%>%{t%}%{I%} CASES-OBL ;

POSS-NOM ; 
POSS-OBL ; 
!POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
!                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis



LEXICON N5 

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<n%>:%{☭%} SUBST ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>:%{☭%} LII-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON 

CASES-NOM ; 
CASES-OBL ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M 

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;               

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-M 

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:%{☭%}  NP-COMMON ; 


LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<top%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS

:%{☭%} NP-TOP ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<top%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<org%>: GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<al%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; 


LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
! e.g. "тыла суохтар", "хараҕа суохтары", etc.

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON A9

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{i%}с # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{i%}с FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;         ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-с # ;

! FIXME: ORDINALS?

%<num%>%<percent%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{а%}%{м%}%- SUBST ; ! -NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{а%}%{м%} SUBST ; ! -NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST ; ! -NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>:%%%{э%}%{с%} SUBST ; ! -NONOM ; ! Dir/LR



LEXICON NUM-ORD

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-MIN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:н # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<par%>:игинэ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:эхэ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:игин # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:игиттэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:игинэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<com%>:игинниин # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<comp%>:игиннээҕэр # ;

LEXICON PRON-EN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:н # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<par%>:йиигинэ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:йиэхэ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:йигин # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:йигиттэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:йигинэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<com%>:йигинниин # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<comp%>:йигиннээҕэр # ;

LEXICON PRON-KINI

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<par%>:тэ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:эхэ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ни # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ттэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:нэн # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<com%>:лиин # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<hu%>%<sg%>%<comp%>:тээҕэр # ;

LEXICON Numerals
сэттэ:сэттэ NUM ; ! "семь"
аҕыс:ахсыс NUM-ORD ; ! "восьмой"  ! FIXME: ordinal
уон:онус NUM-ORD ; ! "десятый" ! FIXME: check
уон% икки:уон% икки NUM ; ! ""
сүүрбэ:сүүрбэ NUM ; ! ""
сүүс:сүүс NUM ; ! ""
мөллүйүөн:мөллүйүөн NUM ; ! ""
маҥнайгы:маҥнайгы NUM-ORD ; ! "первый"
төрдүс:төрдүс NUM-ORD ; ! "четвёртый"
тохсус:тохсус NUM-ORD ; ! "девятый"
иккиэн:иккиэн NUM-COLL ; ! ""
үһүөн:үһүөн NUM-COLL ; ! ""
биэһэ:биэһэ NUM-COLL ; ! ""
тохсуо:тохсуо NUM-COLL ; ! ""
онуо:онуо NUM-COLL ; ! ""
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
L:L NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
LEXICON Nouns 
уол:уолат%>%{L%}%{A%}р N1-IRREG-PL "weight: -0.1" ; ! irregular plural
этчит:этчит N1 ; ! "butcher, meat%-cutter;"
отделение:отделение N5 ; ! ""
пааматынньык:пааматынньык N5 ; ! ""
начальник:начальник N5 ; ! ""
район:район N5 ; ! ""
белок:белок N5 ; ! ""
бусхаат:бусхаат N1 ; ! "снежная пурга, сильная метель"
бэчээттэнии:бэчээттэнии N1 ;
сампай:сампай N1 ;
эрчим:эрчим N1 ;
LEXICON ProperNouns
Туйаара:Туйаара NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Рафаэль:Рафаэль NP-ANT-M; ! "Rafaelʲ" (Ancient Hebrew)
Ева:Ева NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Клавдия:Клавдия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Аксинья:Аксинья NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Игнат:Игнат NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ирбек:Ирбек NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Будда:Будда NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ной:Ной NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Лорен:Лорен NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ильич:Ильич NP-PAT-M ; ! ""
Владимирович:Владимиро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Егорович:Егоро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Константинович:Константино NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Осипович:Осипо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Терентьевич:Терентье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Кондаков:Кондаков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Башарин:Башарин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ярославскай:Ярославскай NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Лебедев:Лебедев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Шадрин:Шадрин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Колчак:Колчак NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кардашевскай:Кардашевскай NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Кушнарев:Кушнарев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Головин:Головин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Черчилль:Черчилль NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Окороков:Окороков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Бравин:Бравин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Толстой:Толстой NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Бхатт:Бхатт NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кулаковский:Кулаковский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Магеллаан:Магеллаан NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Копырин:Копырин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Штыров:Штыров NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Сюльскай:Сюльскай NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Санкт%-Петербуург:Санкт% Петербург NP-TOP-RUS ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
Сталинград:Сталинград NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Париж:Париж NP-TOP-RUS ; ! "Paris"
Иерусалим:Иерусалим NP-TOP-RUS ; ! "Jerusalem"
Эуропа% Холбоһуга:Эуропа% Холбоһук NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! ""
Балтия:Балтия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Конго:Конго NP-TOP ; ! ""
ЯАССР:ЯАССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
США:США NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
Ростов:Ростов NP-TOP ; ! ""
Манчестер:Манчестер NP-TOP ; ! ""
Сэргэлээх:Сэргэлээх NP-TOP ; ! ""
РФ:РФ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
КР:КР NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! "Казахстан Республиката"
РС%(Я%):РС%(Я%) NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
Якутская% АССР:Якутская% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Тыва% АССР:Тыва% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Бурят% АССР:Бурят% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
РСФСР:РСФСР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
СГУ:СГУ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! FIXME: check university = org?
Сахамедиа:Сахамедиа NP-ORG ; ! ""
Роспотребнадзор:Роспотребнадзор NP-ORG ; ! ""
Шеврон:Шеврон NP-ORG ; ! ""
ЯГУ:ЯГУ NP-ORG ; ! ""
ЭПЛ% Даймонд:ЭПЛ% Даймонд NP-ORG ; ! ""
Сака:Сака NP-AL ; ! ""
Мир:Мир NP-AL ; ! ""
Сахаада:Сахаада NP-AL ; ! ""
Джурма:Джурма NP-AL ; ! ""
Волгоград:Волгоград NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Матвиенко:Матвиенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Альмагест:Альмагест NP-AL ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives
баар:баар A3 ; ! "есть"
суох:суох A3 ; ! "нет" 
уопсай:уопсай A1 ; ! "общий"
литературнай:литературнай A9 ; ! ""
филологическай:филологическай A9 ; ! ""
тутулуктаах:тутулуктаах A1 ; ! ""
аҕыйах:аҕыйах  A2 ; ! " lesser, somewhat, some, a little;"
туһалаах:туһалаах  A1 ; ! " beneficial"
хара:хара  A1 ; ! " black;"
атын:атын A2 ; ! "другой; other, another, different"
урукку:урукку A1 ; ! ""
пенсия:пенсия A9 ; ! ""
биирдии:биирдии A2 ; ! ""
суолталаах:суолталаах A2 ; ! ""
рациональнай:рациональнай A9 ; ! ""
бэрт:бэрт A2 ; ! ""
буржуазнай:буржуазнай A9 ; ! ""
наҕараадалаах:наҕараадалаах A4 ; ! ""
дьулаан:дьулаан A4 ;
минньигэстиҥи:минньигэстиҥи A4 ;
тиҥсирики:тиҥсирики A4 ;
чаҕылыҥнас:чаҕылыҥнас A4 ;
